Massachusetts, session 194th, S745.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 6 of chapter 32A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the fourth sentence thereof the following
sentence:-
For active and retired employees, their dependents and the survivors of deceased
employees, including municipal subscribers, the maximum amount of deductibles and
copayments for covered services during an enrollment year in a plan shall not exceed $2,500 for
individual coverage and $5,000 for family coverage.
SECTION 2. Subsection (b) Section 22 of Chapter 32B, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking the first paragraph and inserting the following paragraph:-
of 3

(b) An appropriate public authority may increase the dollar amounts for copayments,
deductibles, tiered provider network copayments and other cost-sharing plan design features;
provided that, for subscribers enrolled in a non-Medicare plan, such features do not exceed plan
design features offered by the commission pursuant to section 4 or 4A of chapter 32A in a non-
Medicare plan with the largest subscriber enrollment and, for subscribers enrolled in a Medicare
plan under section 18A, such features do not exceed plan design features offered by the
commission pursuant to section 4 or 4A of chapter 32A in a Medicare plan with the largest
subscriber enrollment; provided that for active and retired employees, their dependents and the
survivors of deceased employees the maximum amount of health insurance deductibles and
copayments for covered services during an enrollment year in a plan shall not exceed those
offered by the commission; provided, however, that the public authority need only satisfy the
requirements of subsection (a) of section 21 the first time changes are implemented pursuant to
this section; and provided, further that the public authority meet its obligations under subsections
(b) to (h), inclusive, of section 21 each time an increase to a plan design feature is proposed.
SECTION 3. Section 9 of Chapter 32A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting
after the word “credits,”, in line 2, the following words:-
“or excess premium payments made by the Commonwealth and or employees,”
SECTION 4. Section 9 of Chapter 32A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting
the following new paragraph and the end thereof:-
Any and all excess premium payments made by the Commonwealth and or its employees,
shall remain in the trust fund, to be utilized for the purposes of paying the out of pocket costs in
excess of the limitations established in Section 6, or reducing the employees share of the annual
of 3

premium in the event of a deficiency. Premium payments pursuant to this section shall include
sums appropriated by the General Court or paid by the insured for self-insured products offered
by the group insurance commission.
of 3